Utah statutes.
17B-2a-807.5.   Public transit district board of trustees -- Transitional provisions.

(1) (a)  A member appointed to a board of trustees in accordance with Subsection 17B-2a-807(2) prior to April 1, 2009, that is ineligible for reappointment under Subsection (3) may remain on the board of trustees and fulfill the member's appointment until July 1, 2010.

(b)  The term of a member appointed to a board of trustees in accordance with Subsection 17B-2a-807(2) prior to April 1, 2009, that is ineligible for reappointment under Subsection (3) is extended until July 1, 2010 if the member's term of appointment based on the term limits that existed at the time of the member's appointment expires prior to July 1, 2010.

(2)  The term of a member appointed to a board of trustees in accordance with Subsection 17B-2a-807(2) prior to April 1, 2009, shall be extended by two years from the original date of appointment if the member is not ineligible for reappointment under Subsection (3).

(3)  A member appointed to a board of trustees in accordance with Subsection 17B-2a-807(2) prior to April 1, 2009, is not eligible for reappointment to serve on the board of trustees upon expiration of the member's existing term if:

(a) (i)  the appointing entity that appointed the member has appointed more than one member to the board of trustees that are locally elected public officials and the locally elected public officials are serving concurrently on the board of trustees;

(ii)  the member is a locally elected public official that holds an elected position with a municipality; and

(iii)  the other member appointed by the appointing entity described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) is a locally elected public official that holds an elected position with a county; or

(b) (i)  the appointing entity that appointed the member:

(A)  has appointed more than one member to the board of trustees; and

(B)  does not have another member appointed by the appointing entity on the board of trustees that is ineligible under Subsection (3)(a);

(C)  the member has served more than six months on April 1, 2009; and

(D)  the member has served the least amount of time on the board of trustees of all members appointed by that appointing entity to the board of trustees that took the oath of office prior to November 1, 2008.



Enacted by Chapter 364, 2009 General Session

